Vermont, session 2025-2026, H653.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 137 is added to read:
CHAPTER 137. TOWN OF RANDOLPH
§ 1. TOWN POLICE DEPARTMENT; VERMONT STATE EMPLOYEES’
RETIREMENT SYSTEM
Notwithstanding 3 V.S.A. § 489, law enforcement officers employed by the
Town who become members of the Vermont State Employees’ Retirement
VT LEG #386299 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.653
2026 Page 2 of 2
System pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 16, subchapter 2 shall be considered
“Group G members” as defined in 3 V.S.A. § 455.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386299 v.1